North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-20.4 Delinquency
27-20.4-17.
Disposition of a delinquent child.

If the child is found to be a delinquent child, the court shall make findings and include in the order of disposition any actions or steps necessary to ensure:

The child receives the treatment or rehabilitation the court deems most appropriate;

Repairing harm caused to the victim or community; and

Safety of the community.

If the child is found to be a delinquent child, the court may order probation with conditions best suited to the child’s individual need for treatment, rehabilitation, and welfare.

If the court cannot find a less restrictive alternative, the court may commit a child to the division of juvenile services. A risk and needs assessment must be the basis for the determination of commitment to the division of juvenile services. The court only may commit a child to the division for a new delinquent offense. Unless all probation extensions have been exhausted, the child’s risk and treatment needs continue to be high and the child is refusing to comply with the terms of probation, the court may not commit a child for a violation of the terms of probation.

The court may:

Order the child to make monetary restitution to the victim of the offense or to complete a specified number of hours of community service as determined by the court, or both;

Order the periodic testing for the use of illicit drugs or alcohol; or

Order the child’s participation in a juvenile drug court program.

If the delinquent act committed by the child was a sexual offense, the court shall ensure the child is assessed in a timely manner, not to exceed thirty days, with age-appropriate social assessments to determine the appropriate level of required treatment.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-18.
Probation of a delinquent child.

A probation order entered by the court must place the child under the supervision of the director.

The conditions of probation must be specifically stated in writing and provided to the child.

Probation conditions must relate to the individual child’s risk and needs assessment and the adjudicated offense.

Violations of probation conditions may be sanctioned by the juvenile director, or designee utilizing graduated sanctions and incentives.

Formal probation orders may not exceed twelve months from disposition.

The court may release a child from probation or modify the terms and conditions of the probation at any time, but the court shall release a child who has complied satisfactorily with the terms, conditions, and duration of probation and the court shall terminate the court’s jurisdiction.

The director of juvenile court shall establish procedures regarding graduated sanctions and incentives. The graduated sanctions program may include a program of home confinement or electronic monitoring but may not include a secure detention stay.

The director or assigned probation court officer may request two extensions up to four months each or one extension up to four months for intensive supervised probation programs for failure to comply or meet the treatment goals of the court order and case plan.

Probation may not be extended solely to collect restitution. If probation is terminated with restitution owing the victim, court procedure governs continued collection or motion for civil judgment against the parents, if appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-19.
Delinquent children — Suspension of driving privileges.

If a child is adjudicated delinquent of an offense that would be a class A misdemeanor or a felony if the offense were committed by an adult, the juvenile court may order the suspension of the child’s driving privileges for a period of up to six months for the first offense. For a second or subsequent offense, the juvenile court may order the suspension of the child’s driving privileges for up to one year. As a condition to the return of driving privileges, the juvenile court may order the successful completion of an appropriate driver’s examination.

If the juvenile court orders the suspension of a child’s driving privileges, the juvenile court immediately shall take possession of the child’s driver’s license or permit and send copies of the court’s order to the director of the department of transportation who shall make notation of the child’s suspension of driving privileges.

The record of the child’s suspension of driving privileges under this section must be kept confidential and may not be released except to law enforcement personnel in connection with law enforcement activities. The record of a child’s suspension of driving privileges under this section may not be disclosed to or shared with the licensing officials of any other state or jurisdiction. At the end of the six-month or one-year period, the director shall remove and destroy all record of the child’s suspension of driving privileges under this section.

This section may not be construed to limit consensual agreements between the juvenile court and the child restricting the driving privileges of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-20.
Restitution.

In addition to a child being ordered to make restitution under section 27-20.4-16, a parent of a child adjudged delinquent may be ordered to make restitution on the child’s behalf in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars.

Before ordering parental restitution under this section, the court shall hold a hearing on the matter with notice given to all interested parties as to the nature and amount of the parental restitution. In determining whether to order parental restitution, the court shall take the following factors into account:

The ability of the parent or parents to pay monetary restitution and the care and control exercised by the parents.

The ability of the child to pay monetary restitution.

Whether ordering parental restitution would detract from the child’s treatment, rehabilitation, or welfare.

The number of delinquent acts, if any, previously committed by the child.

A parental order of restitution must be limited to those damages directly related to the delinquent act and expenses actually incurred as a result of the delinquent act.

Unless the court directs otherwise, any order of restitution under this section or section 27-20.4-16 may be filed, transcribed, and enforced by the juvenile court or person entitled to the restitution in the same manner as civil judgments rendered by the courts of this state may be enforced. A child against whose parents a judgment may be entered under this section is jointly and severally liable with that child’s parents for the amounts up to five thousand dollars and solely liable for any amounts over that amount. Any judgment rendered under this section may not be discharged in bankruptcy and is not subject to the statutes of limitation provided for in chapter 28-01 and the judgment may not be canceled under section 28-20-35.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-21.
Transfer to other courts.

After a petition has been filed alleging delinquency based on conduct that is designated a crime or public offense under the laws, including local ordinances or resolutions of this state, the court before hearing the petition on the merits shall transfer the offense for prosecution to the appropriate court having jurisdiction of the offense if:

The child is over sixteen years of age and requests the transfer;

The child was fourteen years of age or more at the time of the alleged conduct and the court determines that there is probable cause to believe the child committed the alleged delinquent act and the delinquent act involves the offense of murder or attempted murder; gross sexual imposition or the attempted gross sexual imposition of a victim by force or by threat of imminent death, serious bodily injury, or kidnapping; or

The child was fourteen or more years of age at the time of the alleged conduct;

A hearing on whether the transfer should be made is held in conformity with sections 27-20.2-12, 27-20.2-13, and 27-20.4-14;

Notice in writing of the time, place, and purpose of the hearing is given to the child and the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian at least three days before the hearing; and

The court finds that there are reasonable grounds to believe:

The child committed the delinquent act alleged;

The child is not amenable to treatment or rehabilitation as a child through available programs;

The child is not treatable in an institution for individuals who are intellectually disabled or who are mentally ill;

The interests of the community require that the child be placed under legal restraint or discipline; and

If the child is fourteen or fifteen years old, the child committed a delinquent act involving the infliction or threat of serious bodily harm.

The burden of proving reasonable grounds to believe that a child is amenable to treatment or rehabilitation as a child through available programs is on the child in those cases in which the alleged delinquent act involves the offense of manslaughter, aggravated assault, robbery, arson involving an inhabited structure, or escape involving the use of a firearm, destructive device, or other dangerous weapon or in cases in which the alleged delinquent act involves an offense that if committed by an adult would be a felony and the child has two or more previous delinquency adjudications for offenses that would be a felony if committed by an adult.

In determining a child’s amenability to treatment and rehabilitation, the court shall consider and make specific findings on the following factors:

Age;

Mental capacity;

Maturity;

Degree of criminal sophistication exhibited;

Previous record;

Success or failure of previous attempts to rehabilitate;

Whether the child can be rehabilitated before expiration of juvenile court jurisdiction;

Any psychological, probation, or institutional reports;

The nature and circumstances of the acts for which the transfer is sought;

The prospect for adequate protection of the public; and

Any other relevant factors.

A child subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, either before or after reaching eighteen years of age, may not be prosecuted for an offense previously committed unless the case has been transferred as provided in this section.

Statements made by the child at a hearing under this section are not admissible against the child over objection in the criminal proceedings following the transfer except for impeachment.

If the case is not transferred, the judge who conducted the hearing may not over objection of an interested party preside at the hearing on the petition. If the case is transferred to a court of which the judge who conducted the hearing is also a judge, the judge likewise is disqualified over objection from presiding in the prosecution.

An individual at least twenty years of age who committed an offense while a child and was not adjudicated for the offense in juvenile court may be prosecuted in district court as an adult, unless the state intentionally delayed the prosecution to avoid juvenile court jurisdiction. The district court has original and exclusive jurisdiction for the prosecution under this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-22.
Court order required for removal of child.

An order of disposition or other adjudication in a proceeding under this chapter, in cases in which a child is removed from the home of a parent, custodian, or guardian for the reason that continuation in such home would be contrary to the welfare of the child, must specifically state that a continuation of the child in the home of the parent, custodian, or guardian would be contrary to the welfare of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-23.
Limitations of orders of disposition.

An order of disposition may not exceed twelve months from disposition unless extended by the court. The director or designee may request two extensions up to four months each for the child to complete the treatment goals of the court order and the case plan.

An order of disposition committing a delinquent child to the division of juvenile services may not exceed twelve months. The court may extend the order for an additional twelve-month period, if:

A hearing is held upon motion of the division, or on the court’s own motion, prior to the expiration of the order;

Reasonable notice of the hearing and an opportunity to be heard are given to the child and the parent, guardian, or other custodian;

The court finds the extension is necessary for the treatment or rehabilitation of the child and has determined that such treatment cannot be provided in their home community; and

The extension does not exceed twelve months from the expiration of an order limited by subsection 3 or two years from the expiration of any other limited order.

Except as provided in subsection 2, an order of disposition pursuant to which a child is placed in foster care may not continue for more than twelve months after the child is considered to have entered foster care. A permanency hearing must be conducted before the extension of any court order limited under this subsection. Any other order of disposition may not continue in force for more than twelve months.

The court may terminate an order of disposition before the expiration of the order.

Except as provided in subsection 2, the court may terminate an order of disposition or extension before its expiration, on or without an application of a party, if it appears to the court the purposes of the order have been accomplished. If a party may be adversely affected by the order of termination, the order may be made only after reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard have been given to the party.

When the child attains the age of twenty years, all orders affecting the child then in force terminate and the child is discharged from further obligation or control.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-24.
Reasonable efforts to prevent removal or to reunify — When required.

As used in this section, “reasonable efforts” means the exercise of due diligence, by the agency granted authority over the child under this chapter, to use appropriate and available services to meet the needs of the child and the child’s family in order to prevent removal of the child from the child’s family or, after removal, to use appropriate and available services to eliminate the need for removal, to reunite the child and the child’s family, and to maintain family connections. In determining reasonable efforts to be made with respect to a child under this section, and in making reasonable efforts, the child’s health and safety must be the paramount concern.

Except as provided in subsection 4, reasonable efforts must be made to preserve families, reunify families, and maintain family connections:

Before the placement of a child in foster care, to prevent or eliminate the need for removing the child from the child’s home;

To make it possible for a child to return safely to the child’s home;

Whether and, if applicable, to place siblings in the same foster care, relative, guardianship, or adoptive placement, unless it is determined that such a joint placement would be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings; and

In the case of siblings removed from the home of the siblings who are not jointly placed, to provide for frequent visitation or other ongoing interaction between the siblings, unless it is contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings.

If the court or the child’s custodian determined that continuation of reasonable efforts, as described in subsection 2, is inconsistent with the permanency plan for the child, reasonable efforts must be made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

Reasonable efforts of the type described in subsection 2 are not required if:

A court of competent jurisdiction has determined a parent has subjected a child to aggravated circumstances; or

The parental rights of the parent, with respect to another child of the parent, have been involuntarily terminated.

Efforts to place a child for adoption, with a fit and willing relative or other appropriate individual as a legal guardian, or in another planned permanent living arrangement, may be made concurrently with reasonable efforts of the type described in subsection 2.

Removal of a child from the child’s home for placement in foster care must be based on judicial findings stated in the court’s order, and determined on a case-by-case basis in a manner that complies with the requirements of titles IV-B and IV-E of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 620 et seq. and 42 U.S.C. 6701 et seq.], as amended, and federal regulations adopted under those federal laws, provided that this subsection may not provide a basis for overturning an otherwise valid court order.

For the purpose of section 27-20.3-17, reasonable efforts were made under this section to meet the child’s needs before a foster care placement for a child remaining in care for continued foster care purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-25.
Law enforcement and correctional facility records.

Unless a charge of delinquency is transferred for criminal prosecution under section 27-20.4-20, the interest of national security requires, or the court otherwise orders in the interest of the child, the law enforcement and correctional facility records and files of a child alleged or found to be delinquent or in need of services or protection are not open to public inspection; but inspection of these records and files is permitted by:

A juvenile court having the child before the court in any proceeding;

Counsel for a party to the proceeding;

The officers of public institutions or agencies to whom the child is or may be committed;

Law enforcement officers of other jurisdictions if necessary for the discharge of official duties of the officers;

A court in which the child is convicted of a criminal offense for the purpose of a presentence report or other dispositional proceeding, or by officials of correctional facilities to which the child is detained or committed, or by the parole board, the governor, or the pardon advisory board, if one has been appointed, in considering the child’s parole or discharge or in exercising supervision over the child;

The professional staff of the uniform crime victims compensation program if necessary for the discharge of the duties of the professional staff pursuant to chapter 54-23.4; and

A superintendent, assistant superintendent, principal, or designee of the school in which the child is currently enrolled or of a school in which the child wishes to enroll.

Notwithstanding that law enforcement records and files of a child alleged or found to be delinquent or in need of services or protection are not open to public inspection, this section does not limit the release of general information that does not identify the identity of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-26.
Substance use programming.

If a child is subject to nonjudicial adjustments under this chapter and is found to be delinquent under section 27-20.4-16, or is found to be in need of services or protection under section 27-20.3-16, the juvenile court may require a substance use screening and subsequent programming to appropriately address:

A child who is found to have violated section 39-08-01 or equivalent; or

If a child is found to have an alcohol concentration of at least two one-hundredths of one percent by weight at the time of performance of a test within two hours after driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle.

If a child is subject to informal adjustment under this chapter and is required to participate in the twenty-four seven sobriety program, the period of participation may not exceed six months.

If a child required to participate in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under this section fails to comply with program requirements without being excused, the testing site shall notify the juvenile court and refer the child to the juvenile court for further disposition. The child may not be detained or otherwise taken into custody without authorization from the juvenile court.

If the juvenile court requires the child to participate in a juvenile drug court program, the juvenile court may waive the participation in the twenty-four seven sobriety program requirements of this section.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.4-27.
Tribal juvenile services cooperative agreement — Report to legislative management. [Expires July 31, 2023]

The department of corrections and rehabilitation, through the division of juvenile services; the supreme court, through the office of the state court administrator; and the Indian affairs commission may negotiate and enter a memorandum of understanding with the tribal government of a federally recognized Indian tribe in the state for the purpose of accepting and providing for, in accordance with this chapter, the treatment and rehabilitation of tribal juveniles who have been adjudicated in tribal court under tribal or federal laws. Under the pilot program and terms of a memorandum of understanding:

The tribal government, the department of corrections and rehabilitation, and the juvenile court may exchange information relevant to the treatment and rehabilitation needs of a tribal juvenile and the juvenile’s family, including tribal court orders, medical and psychiatric reports, law enforcement reports, and other information pertinent to the referral;

The juvenile court and the department of corrections and rehabilitation shall provide services based on the individualized need of each tribal juvenile referred to and accepted by the tribal court, juvenile court, and department of corrections and rehabilitation;

The juvenile court and the department of corrections and rehabilitation shall maintain regular contact with the tribe regarding each tribal juvenile who has been placed in the supervision of the respective agency; and

The juvenile court and the department of corrections and rehabilitation may limit the number of tribal juveniles accepted based on criteria developed by the juvenile court and the availability of state resources and services.

Before July first of each even-numbered year, the department of corrections and rehabilitation, the juvenile court, and the Indian affairs commission shall report and make recommendations to the legislative management on the status, effectiveness, performance, and sustainability of a memorandum of understanding established under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 550, § 4, effective December 1, 2021.